test/src/morphology/V-bahtet_gt-norm.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.hfst
  xerox:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.xfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.xfst
    App: lookup

Tests:

# todo:
# Proofread the gold standard (below)
# Then: run analyser, then correct. 


  Verb - båhtet: # Verb 'to bring' - ei tsekattu
     båhtet+V+Inf: båhtet
     båhtet+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: bådav
     båhtet+V+Ind+Prs+Sg2: båda
     båhtet+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: båhtá
     båhtet+V+Ind+Prs+Du1: buhtin
     båhtet+V+Ind+Prs+Du2: båhtebehtin
     båhtet+V+Ind+Prs+Du2: båhtebähtten
     båhtet+V+Ind+Prs+Du3: båhteba
     båhtet+V+Ind+Prs+Pl1: båhtep
     båhtet+V+Ind+Prs+Pl2: båhtebihtit
     båhtet+V+Ind+Prs+Pl2: båhtebehtit
     båhtet+V+Ind+Prs+Pl3: buhti

     båhtet+V+Ind+Prt+Sg1: buhtiv
     båhtet+V+Ind+Prt+Sg2: buhti
     båhtet+V+Ind+Prt+Sg3: budij
     båhtet+V+Ind+Prt+Du1: budijmen
     båhtet+V+Ind+Prt+Du2: budijden
     båhtet+V+Ind+Prt+Du3: budijga
     båhtet+V+Ind+Prt+Pl1: budijme
     båhtet+V+Ind+Prt+Pl2: budijde
     båhtet+V+Ind+Prt+Pl3: buhtin

     båhtet+V+Pot+Sg1: buditjav
     båhtet+V+Pot+Sg2: buditja
     båhtet+V+Pot+Sg3: budjtj
     båhtet+V+Pot+Du1: budjtjin
     båhtet+V+Pot+Du2: budjtjähppen
     båhtet+V+Pot+Du2: budjtjiehpen
     båhtet+V+Pot+Du3: budjtjiebá
     båhtet+V+Pot+Pl1: budjtjip
     båhtet+V+Pot+Pl2: budjtjihpit
     båhtet+V+Pot+Pl3: buditji

     båhtet+V+GerI: bådedin 
     båhtet+V+Sup: bådátjit
     båhtet+V+Vabe: båhtek  
     båhtet+V+Vgen: både 
     båhtet+V+GerII: båhtemin
     båhtet+V+PrfPrc: båhtám
     båhtet+V+PrsPrc: båhtte 
     båhtet+V+Imp+Sg2: både  
     båhtet+V+Imp+Du2: båhten
     båhtet+V+Imp+Pl2: buhtit
     båhtet+V+Vsubst: båhtem
